Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8463.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12-7-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-7 entitled "Arrest" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
12-7-10. Resisting legal or illegal arrest Resisting legal or illegal arrest by peace
officer-Resisting directive of correctional officer.
(a)(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to use force or any weapon in resisting a legal or
an illegal arrest by a peace officer, if the person has reasonable ground to believe that he or she is
being arrested and that the arrest is being made by a peace officer.
(2) It shall be unlawful for any person in custody of the Rhode Island department of
corrections to use any force or weapon to resist a lawful request or directive by a corrections officer.
(i) As used in this section, "a lawful request or directive "means an order issued within the
scope of a correctional officer's official duties and consistent with state law and department
regulations.
(b) Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be punished by a fine of not
more than five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both
fine and imprisonment.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006330/SUB A
========